Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Article 5. Enforcement.

§ 81-14-201.
Cease and desist orders.

If any person or savings bank is engaging in, or has engaged in, or is about to engage in, any unsafe or unsound practice, or unfair and discriminatory practice, in conducting the savings bank’s business, or violation of any other law, rule, regulation, order or condition imposed in writing by the commissioner, the commissioner may issue a notice of charges to such person or institution. A notice of charges shall specify the acts alleged to sustain a cease and desist order, and state the time and place at which a hearing shall be held. A hearing before the commissioner on the charges shall be held no earlier than seven (7) days, and no later than fifteen (15) days, after issuance of the notice. The charged institution is entitled to a further extension of seven (7) days upon filing a request with the commissioner. The commissioner may also issue a notice of charges if he has reasonable grounds to believe that any person or savings bank is about to engage in any unsafe or unsound business practice, or any violation of this chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order. If, by a preponderance of the evidence, it is shown that any person or savings bank is engaged in, or has been engaged in, or is about to engage in, any unsafe or unsound business practice, or unfair and discriminatory practice or any violation of this chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order, a cease and desist order shall be issued which shall be permanently binding upon the person or institution until terminated by the commissioner.

If any person or state savings bank is engaging in, has engaged in, or is about to engage in any unsafe or unsound practice, or unfair and discriminatory practice, in conducting the savings bank’s business, or any violation of the act or of any other law, rules, regulation, order or condition imposed in writing by the commissioner, and the commissioner has determined that immediate corrective action is required, the commissioner may issue a temporary cease and desist order without prior notice. A temporary cease and desist order shall be effective immediately upon issuance for a period of fifteen (15) days, and may be extended once for a period of fifteen (15) days. Such an order shall state its duration on its face and the words “Temporary Cease and Desist Order.” A hearing before the commissioner shall be held within the time that the order remains effective, at which time a temporary order may be dissolved or made permanent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 54; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 151; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 56; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-203.
Civil penalties; state savings banks.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any savings bank which is found to have violated any provision of this article may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00). Any savings bank which is found to have violated or failed to comply with any cease and desist order issued under the authority of this article may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) for each day that the violation or failure to comply continues.

To enforce the provisions of this section, the commissioner is authorized to assess such penalty and to appear in a court of competent jurisdiction and to move the court to order payment of the penalty. Prior to the assessment of the penalty, a hearing shall be held by the commissioner.

Nothing in this section shall prevent anyone damaged by a state savings bank from bringing a separate cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 55; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 57; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-205.
Civil penalties; directors, officers and employees.

Any person, whether a director, officer or employee, who is found to have violated any provision of this article, whether willfully, or as a result of gross negligence, gross incompetency or recklessness, may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation. Any person who is found to have violated or failed to comply with any cease and desist order issued under the authority of this article may be ordered to pay a civil penalty not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation for each day that the violation or failure to comply continues.

To enforce the provisions of this section, the commissioner is authorized to assess such penalty, to appear in a court of competent jurisdiction and to move the court to order payment of the penalty. Prior to the assessment of the penalty, a hearing shall be held by the commissioner.

Nothing in this section shall prevent anyone damaged by a director, officer or employee of a state savings bank from bringing a separate cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 56; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 58; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-207.
Supervisory control.

Whenever the commissioner determines that a solvent savings bank is conducting its business in an unsafe or unsound manner, or in any fashion which threatens the financial integrity or sound operation of the savings bank, the commissioner may serve a notice of charges on the savings bank, requiring it to show why it should not be placed under supervisory control. Such notice of charges shall specify the grounds for supervisory control, and set the time and place for a hearing. A hearing before the commissioner pursuant to such notice shall be held within fifteen (15) days after issuance of the notice of charges.

If, after the hearing provided above, the commissioner determines that supervisory control of the savings bank is necessary to protect the savings bank’s members, customers, stockholders or creditors, or the general public, the commissioner shall issue an order taking supervisory control of the savings bank.

If the order taking supervisory control becomes final, the commissioner may appoint an agent to supervise and monitor the operations of the savings bank during the period of supervisory control. During the period of supervisory control, the savings bank shall act in accordance with such instructions as may be given by the commissioner, directly or through his supervisory agent, and shall not fail to act, except when to do so would violate an outstanding cease and desist order.

Within one hundred eighty (180) days of the date the order taking supervisory control becomes final, the commissioner shall issue an order approving a plan for the termination of supervisory control. The plan may provide for:

The issuance by the savings bank of capital stock;

The appointment of one or more officers and/or directors;

The reorganization, merger or consolidation of the savings bank;

The dissolution and liquidation of the savings bank;

Other such measures as determined by the commissioner.

The order approving the plan shall not take effect until thirty (30) days after issuance during which time period an appeal may be filed in accordance with the provisions of Section 81-14-175.

All costs of this proceeding shall be paid by the savings bank.

For the purpose of this section, an order shall be deemed final if:

No appeal is filed within the specific time allowed for the appeal; or

All judicial appeals are exhausted.

If a savings bank is insolvent, the provisions of Section 81-14-211 shall apply.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 57; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 152; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 59; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-209.
Removal of directors, officers and employees.

If, in the commissioner’s opinion, any director, officer or employee of any savings bank has participated in, or consented to, any violation of this chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order, or any unsafe or unsound business practice in the operation of any savings bank, or any insider loan not specifically authorized by or pursuant to this chapter, or any repeated violation of, or failure to comply with, any savings bank’s bylaws, the commissioner may serve a written notice of charges upon such director, officer or employee and the savings bank, stating his intent to remove such director, officer or employee. Such notice shall specify the alleged conduct of such director, officer or employee and shall state the place for a hearing before the commissioner. A hearing shall be held no earlier than fifteen (15) days, but no later than thirty (30) days, after the notice of charges is served. If, after the hearing, the commissioner determines that the charges asserted have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence, the commissioner may issue an order removing the director, officer or employee in question. Such an order shall be effective upon issuance and may include the entire board of directors or all of the officers of the savings bank.

If it is determined that any director, officer or employee of any savings bank has knowingly participated in, or consented to, any violation of this chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order, or engaged in any unsafe or unsound business practice in the operation of any savings bank, or any repeated violation of, or failure to comply with, any savings bank’s bylaws, and that as a result, a situation exists requiring immediate corrective action, the commissioner may issue an order temporarily removing such person or persons pending a hearing. Such an order shall state its duration on its face and the words “Temporary Order of Removal” and shall be effective upon issuance for a period of fifteen (15) days. Such order may be extended once for a period of fifteen (15) days. A hearing must be held within ten (10) days of the expiration of a temporary order, or any extension thereof, at which time a temporary order may be dissolved or converted to a permanent order.

Any removal pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be effective in all respects as if such removal has been made by the board of directors and the members or stockholders of the savings bank in question.

Without the prior written approval of the commissioner, no director, officer or employee permanently removed pursuant to this section shall be eligible to be elected, reelected or appointed to any position as a director, officer or employee of that savings bank, nor shall such director, officer or employee be eligible to be elected to or retain a position as a director, officer or employee of any other state savings bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 58; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 153; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 60; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-211.
Involuntary liquidation.

The commissioner may take custody of the books, records and assets of every kind of any savings bank organized and operated under the provisions of this chapter for any of the purposes hereinafter enumerated if it reasonably appears from examinations or from reports made to the commissioner that:

The directors, officers or liquidators have neglected, failed or refused to take such action which the commissioner may deem necessary for the protection of the savings bank, or have impeded or obstructed an examination; or

The net worth of the savings bank is impaired to the extent that the realizable value of its assets is insufficient to pay in full its creditors and holders of deposit accounts; or

The business of the savings bank is being conducted in a fraudulent, illegal or unsafe manner, or that the savings bank is in an unsafe or unsound condition to transact business; (any savings bank which, except as authorized in writing by the commissioner, fails to make full payment of any withdrawal when due is in an unsafe or unsound condition to transact business, notwithstanding such provisions of the certificate of incorporation or such statutes or regulations with respect to payment of withdrawals in event a savings bank does not pay all withdrawals in full); or

The officers, directors or employees have assumed duties or performed acts in excess of those authorized by statute or regulation or charter, or without supplying the required bond; or

The savings bank has experienced a substantial dissipation of assets or earnings due to any violation of statute or regulation, or due to any unsafe or unsound practice or practices; or

The savings bank is insolvent, or is in imminent danger of insolvency, or has suspended its ordinary business transactions due to insufficient funds; or

The savings bank is unable to continue operations.

Unless the commissioner finds that such an emergency exists which may result in loss to members, deposit account holders, stockholders or creditors, and which requires that he take custody immediately, the commissioner shall first give written notice to the directors and officers specifying the conditions criticized and allowing a reasonable time for corrections before a receiver shall be appointed.

The purpose for which the commissioner may take custody of a savings bank include, but are not limited to, examination or further examination, conservation of its assets, restoration of impaired capital, and the making of any reasonable or equitable adjustment deemed necessary by the commissioner under any plan of reorganization.

If the commissioner, after taking custody of a savings bank, finds that one or more of the reasons for having taken custody continues to exist through the period of his custody with little or no likelihood of amelioration of the situation, then he shall appoint as receiver or co-receiver any qualified person, firm or corporation for the purpose of liquidation of the savings bank. Such receiver shall furnish bond in form, amount and with surety as the commissioner may require. The commissioner may appoint the institution’s deposit account insurance corporation or its nominee as the receiver. Such insuring corporation shall be permitted to serve without posting bond.

In the event the commissioner appoints a receiver for a savings bank, he shall mail a certified copy of the appointment order by certified mail to the address of the savings bank, as it appears on the records of the department, to any previous receiver or other legal custodian of the savings bank and to any court or other authority to which such previous receiver or other legal custodian is subject. Notice of such appointment may be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the savings bank has its principal office.

Whenever a receiver for a savings bank is appointed pursuant to subsection (4), the savings bank may within thirty (30) days thereafter bring an action in the chancery court in the county in which the home office of the institution is located for an order to remove such receiver.

The duly appointed and qualified receiver shall take possession promptly of such savings bank in accordance with the terms of the appointment by service of a certified copy of the commissioner’s appointment order upon the savings bank at its principal office through the officer or employee who is present and appears to be in charge. Immediately upon taking possession of the savings bank, the receiver shall take possession and title of books, records and assets of the savings bank. The receiver, by operation of law and without any conveyance or other instrument, act or deed, shall succeed to all the rights, titles, powers and privileges of the savings bank, its members or stockholders, holders of deposit accounts, its officers and directors, and to the titles of the books, records and assets of any previous receiver or other legal custodian of the savings bank. Such members, stockholders, holders of deposit accounts, officers or directors shall not thereafter, except as hereinafter expressly provided, exercise any such rights, powers or privileges, or act in connection with any assets or property of any nature of the savings bank in receivership. The commissioner may at any time direct the receiver to return the savings bank to its previous or newly constituted management. The commissioner may provide for a meeting of the members or stockholders for any purpose, including the election of directors or an increase in the number of directors, or both, or the election of an entire new board of directors for any purpose, including the filling of vacancies on the board, the removal of officers and the election of new officers. Any such meeting of members or stockholders, or of directors, shall be supervised or conducted by a representative of the commission.

A duly appointed and qualified receiver shall have authority to:

Demand, sue for, collect, receive and take into his possession all the goods and chattels, rights and credits, monies and effects, lands and tenements, books, papers, choses in action, bills, notes and property of every description of the savings bank;

Foreclose mortgages, deeds of trust and other liens executed to the savings bank to the extent the savings bank would have had such right;

Institute suits for the recovery of any estate, property, damages or demands existing in favor of the savings bank, and shall, upon his own application, be substituted as plaintiff in the place of the savings bank in any suit or proceeding pending at the time of his appointment;

Sell, convey and assign all the property rights and interest owned by the savings bank;

Appoint agents to serve at his pleasure;

Examine and investigate papers and persons, and pass on claims as provided in the regulations prescribed by the commissioner;

Make and carry out agreements with the insuring corporation or with any other financial institution for the payment or assumption of the savings bank’s liabilities, in whole or in part, and to sell, convey, transfer, pledge or assign assets as security or otherwise and to make guarantees in connection therewith; and

Perform all other acts which might be done by the employees, officers and directors; such powers shall be continued in effect until liquidation and dissolution, or until return of the savings bank to its prior or newly constituted management.

A receiver may at any time during the receivership and prior to final liquidation be removed and a replacement appointed by the commissioner.

The commissioner may determine that such liquidation proceedings should be discontinued. He may then remove the receiver and restore or grant all the rights, powers and privileges of its members and stockholders, customers, employees, officers and directors, or newly constituted management. The return of a savings bank to its management or to a newly constituted management from the possession of a receiver shall, by operation of law and without any conveyance or other instrument, act or deed, vest in the savings bank the title to all property held by the receiver in his capacity as a receiver for the savings bank.

Claims against a state savings bank in receivership shall have the following order of priority for payment:

Costs, expenses and debts of the savings bank incurred on or after the date of the appointment of the receiver, including compensation for the receiver;

Claims of holders of deposit accounts;

Claims of general creditors;

Claims of stockholders of a stock savings bank;

All remaining assets to members and stockholders in an amount proportionate to their holdings as of the date of the appointment of the receiver.

All claims of each class of priority described in subsection (11) shall be paid in full so long as sufficient assets remain. Members of the class for which the receiver cannot make payment in full because assets will be depleted shall be paid an amount proportionate to their total claims.

The commissioner shall have the authority to direct the payment of claims for which no provision is herein made, and may direct the payment or claims within a class. The commissioner shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations governing the payment of claims by an institution in receivership.

When all assets of the savings bank have been fully liquidated, all claims and expenses have been paid or settled and the receiver has recommended a final distribution, the dissolution of the savings bank in receivership shall be accomplished in the following manner:

The receiver shall file with the commissioner a detailed report, in a form to be prescribed by the commissioner, of his acts and proposed final distribution and dissolution.

Upon the commissioner’s approval of the final report of the receiver, the receiver shall provide such notice, and thereafter shall make such final distribution, in such manner as the commissioner may direct.

When a final distribution has been made, except as to any unclaimed funds, the receiver shall deposit such unclaimed funds with the commissioner and shall deliver to the commissioner all books and records of the dissolved institution.

Upon final dissolution of the savings bank in receivership or at such time the receiver is relieved of his duties, the commissioner shall cause an audit to be conducted, during which the receiver shall be available to assist. The accounts of the receiver shall then be ruled upon by the commissioner and, if approved, the receiver shall thereupon be given a final and complete discharge and release.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 59; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 154; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 61; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-213.
Judicial review.

Any person or state savings bank against whom a cease and desist order is issued or a fine is imposed may have such order or fine reviewed by a court of competent jurisdiction. Except as otherwise provided, an appeal may be made only within thirty (30) days of the issuance of the order or the imposition of the fine, whichever is later.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 60; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 62; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-215.
Indemnity.

No person who is fined or penalized for a violation of any criminal provision of this article shall be reimbursed or indemnified in any fashion by the savings bank for such fine or penalty.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 61; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 63; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 63, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-217.
Cumulative penalties.

All penalties, fines and remedies provided by this article shall be cumulative.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 62; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 64; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 64, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-219.
Emergency limitations.

The commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, may impose a limitation upon the amounts withdrawable or payable from deposit accounts of savings banks during any specifically defined period when such limitation is in the public interest and welfare.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 63; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 65; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 65, eff from and after July 1, 2001.